Hawaii statutes.
[§327E-4] Revocation of advance health-care
directive. (a) An individual may revoke the designation of an agent only
by a signed writing or by personally informing the supervising health-care
provider.

(b) An individual may revoke all or part of an
advance health-care directive, other than the designation of an agent, at any
time and in any manner that communicates an intent to revoke.

(c) A health-care provider, agent, guardian,
or surrogate who is informed of a revocation shall promptly communicate the
fact of the revocation to the supervising health-care provider and to any
health-care institution at which the patient is receiving care.

(d) A decree of annulment, divorce,
dissolution of marriage, or legal separation revokes a previous designation of
a spouse as agent unless otherwise specified in the decree or in a power of
attorney for health care.

(e) An advance health-care directive that
conflicts with an earlier advance health-care directive revokes the earlier
directive to the extent of the conflict. [L 1999, c 169, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next